Washington statutes.
RCW 38.38.572

[Art. 69] Petition for a new trial.

At any time within two years after approval by the convening authority of a court-martial sentence which extends to dismissal or dishonorable discharge, the accused may petition the governor for a new trial on ground of newly discovered evidence or fraud on the court-martial.

[ 1989 c 48 s 59; 1963 c 220 s 71.]